District of Columbia statutes.
22-1842

Training program.

(a)

The Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”), the Child and Family Services Agency (“CFSA”), and the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services (“DYRS”) shall provide training on human trafficking to:

(1)

New law enforcement officers, social workers, and case managers; and

(2)

Current law enforcement officers, social worker employees, and case managers who have not previously received comparable training.

(b)

The training shall be a minimum of 4 hours and shall include:

(1)

The nature and dimension of human trafficking;

(2)

The legal rights and remedies available to a victim of human trafficking;

(3)

The services and facilities available to a victim of human trafficking;

(4)

The legal duties imposed on a police officer, social worker, or case manager to enforce the provisions of D.C. Law 20-276, and to offer protection and assistance to a victim of human trafficking;

(5)

Techniques for determining when a person may be a victim of trafficking;

(6)

Techniques for handling a human trafficking offense that promotes the safety of the victim; and

(7)

The particular needs of youth and minor trafficking victims;

(c)

MPD, CFSA, and DYRS shall consult with community organizations that provide training, resources, advocacy, or services to victims of human trafficking for assistance in developing and presenting training on human trafficking.

History

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 112
as added May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-276, § 6(a), 62 DCR 479